New Jersey, session 222, S3142.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 12 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.39:6A-4.2) is amended to read as follows: Primacy of coverages.  [Except as provided in subsection d. of section 13 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.39:6A-4.3), the] The personal injury protection coverage of the named insured shall be the primary coverage for the named insured and any resident relative in the named insured's household who is not a named insured under an automobile insurance policy of his own.  No person shall recover personal injury protection benefits under more than one automobile insurance policy for injuries sustained in any one accident.  No automobile insurer shall permit the selection of other health insurance coverage or benefits as the primary coverage in regard to medical expense benefits pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-4). (cf: P.L.1990, c.8, s.5) 2.    Section 13 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.39:6A-4.3) is amended to read as follows: 13.  Personal injury protection coverage options. With respect to personal injury protection coverage provided on an automobile in accordance with section 4 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-4), the automobile insurer shall provide the following coverage options: a.     Medical expense benefit deductibles in amounts of $500.00, $1,000.00, $2,000.00 and $2,500.00 for any one accident; b.    The option to exclude all benefits offered under subsections b., c., [d.,] and e. of section 4; c.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1988, c.119.) d.    [For policies issued or renewed on or after January 1, 1991, the option that other health insurance coverage or benefits of the insured, including health care services provided by a health maintenance organization and any coverage or benefits provided under any federal or State program, are the primary coverage in regard to medical expense benefits pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-4).  If health insurance coverage or benefits are primary, an automobile insurer providing medical expense benefits under personal injury protection coverage shall be liable for reasonable medical expenses not covered by the health insurance coverage or benefits up to the limit of the medical expense benefits coverage.  The principles of coordination of benefits shall apply to personal injury protection medical expense benefits coverage pursuant to this subsection;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.    ) (pending before the Legislation as this bill) e.     Medical expense benefits in amounts of $150,000, $75,000, $50,000 or $15,000 per person per accident; except that, medical expense benefits shall be paid in an amount not to exceed $250,000 for all medically necessary treatment of permanent or significant brain injury, spinal cord injury or disfigurement or for medically necessary treatment of other permanent or significant injuries rendered at a trauma center or acute care hospital immediately following the accident and until the patient is stable, no longer requires critical care and can be safely discharged or transferred to another facility in the judgment of the attending physician.  The coverage election form shall contain a statement, clearly readable and in 12-point bold type, in a form approved by the commissioner, that election of any of the aforesaid medical expense benefits options results in less coverage than the $250,000 medical expense benefits coverage mandated prior to the effective date of P.L.1998, c.21. If none of the aforesaid medical expense benefits options is affirmatively chosen in writing, the policy shall provide $250,000 medical expense benefits coverage; f.     The insurer shall provide an appropriate reduction from the territorial base rate for personal injury protection coverage for those electing any of the options in subsections a., b., [d.] and e. of this section. [Any named insured who chooses the option provided by subsection d. of this section shall provide proof that he and members of his family residing in his household are covered by health insurance coverage or benefits in a manner and to an extent approved by the commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a health insurer, health maintenance organization or governmental agency to cover individuals or treatment which is not normally covered under the applicable benefit contract or plan.  If it is determined that an insured who selected or is otherwise covered by the option provided in subsection d. of this section did not have such health coverage in effect at the time of an accident, medical expense benefits shall be payable by the person's automobile insurer and shall be subject to any deductible required by law or otherwise selected as an option pursuant to subsection a. of this section, any copayment required by law and an additional deductible in the amount of $750.] An option elected by the named insured in accordance with this section shall apply only to the named insured and any resident relative in the named insured's household who is not a named insured under another automobile insurance policy, and not to any other person eligible for personal injury protection benefits required to be provided in accordance with section 4 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-4). Medical expense benefits payable in any amount between the deductible selected pursuant to subsection a. of this section and $5,000.00 shall be subject to the copayment provided in the policy, if any. No insurer or health provider providing benefits to an insured who has elected a deductible pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall have a right of subrogation for the amount of benefits paid pursuant to a deductible elected thereunder or any applicable copayment. The Commissioner of Banking and Insurance shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section and may promulgate standards applicable to the coordination of personal injury protection medical expense benefits coverage. (cf: P.L.1998, c.22, s.3) 3.    Section 12 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-12) is amended to read as follows: 12.  Inadmissibility of evidence of losses collectible under personal injury protection coverage. Except as may be required in an action brought pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.39:6A-9.1), evidence of the amounts collectible or paid under a standard automobile insurance policy pursuant to sections 4 and 10 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-4 and 39:6A-10), amounts collectible or paid for medical expense benefits under a basic automobile insurance policy pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1998, c.21 (C.39:6A-3.1) and amounts collectible or paid for benefits under a special automobile insurance policy pursuant to section 45 of P.L.2003, c.89 (C.39:6A-3.3), to an injured person, including the amounts of any deductibles, copayments or exclusions, [including exclusions pursuant to subsection d. of section 13 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.39:6A-4.3),] otherwise compensated is inadmissible in a civil action for recovery of damages for bodily injury by such injured person. The court shall instruct the jury that, in arriving at a verdict as to the amount of the damages for noneconomic loss to be recovered by the injured person, the jury shall not speculate as to the amount of the medical expense benefits paid or payable by an automobile insurer under personal injury protection coverage payable under a standard automobile insurance policy pursuant to sections 4 and 10 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-4 and 39:6A-10), medical expense benefits under a basic automobile insurance policy pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1998, c.21 (C.39:6A-3.1) or benefits under a special automobile insurance policy pursuant to section 45 of P.L.2003, c.89 (C.39:6A-3.3) to the injured person[, nor shall they speculate as to the amount of benefits paid or payable by a health insurer, health maintenance organization or governmental agency under subsection d. of section 13 of P.L.1983, c.362 (C.39:6A-4.3)]. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of recovery, against the tortfeasor, of uncompensated economic loss as defined by subsection k. of section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), including all unreimbursed medical expenses not covered by the personal injury protection limits applicable to the injured party and sustained by the injured party, including the value of any deductibles and copayments incurred through a driver's secondary insurance coverage and medical liens asserted by a health insurance company related to the treatment of injuries sustained in the accident.  Medical expenses shall be subject to the current automobile medical fee schedules established pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1988, c.119 (C.39:6A-4.6).  In any case in which the recovery is for medical expenses only, a prevailing claimant shall be entitled to reasonable and necessary attorneys' fees incurred by the prevailing claimant in the collection of such medical expenses. (cf: P.L.2019, c.245, s.2) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all plans that are delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State, or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act.